Hawaii, session 2026, SB368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 622, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§622-A  Billing records.  (a)  If a patient of a health care provider requests copies of the patient's detailed billing records of services rendered, the copies shall be made available to the patient within ten working days of the request. (b)  If a patient of a health care provider has a credit on the patient's account after related services have been provided and paid for, the health care provider shall provide written notice of the credit to the patient. (c)  For purposes of this section, "health care provider" has the same meaning as defined in section 671-1. §622-B  Penalties.  Any person found to have violated section 622-57(a) or section 622-A shall be fined not more than: (1)  $ for a first violation; and (2)  $ for any subsequent violation." SECTION 2.  Section 622-57, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) If a patient of a health care provider as defined in section 671‑1, requests copies of the patient's medical records, the copies shall be made available to the patient in a timely manner pursuant to title 45 Code of Federal Regulations section 164-524(b) unless, in the opinion of the health care provider, it would be detrimental to the health of the patient to obtain the records.  If the health care provider is of the opinion that release of the records to the patient would be detrimental to the health of the patient, the health care provider shall advise the patient that copies of the records will be made available to the patient's attorney upon presentation of a proper authorization signed by the patient." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________